Washington statutes.
RCW 18.230.070

Registration—Required information—Fee.

Applications for registration must be submitted on forms provided by the secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for registration provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each applicant must pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee must accompany the application.

[ 2002 c 216 s 8.]